Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1708
Collection of taxes; county treasurer; cash book.

The county treasurer is required to keep a cash book in which he or she shall enter an account of all money received, specifying in proper columns provided for that purpose the date of payment, the number of the receipt issued therefor, and on account of what fund or funds the same was paid, whether state, county, school, learning community, road, sinking fund or otherwise, each in separate columns, and the total amount for which the receipt was given in another column. The treasurer shall keep the account of money received for and on account of taxes separate and distinct from money received on any other account. He or she shall also keep the account of money received for and on account of taxes levied and assessed for any one year separate and distinct from those levied and assessed for any other year. All entries in the cash book of money received for taxes shall be in the numerical order of the receipts issued therefor.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 151, p. 443;

Laws 1913, c. 185, § 1, p. 561;

R.S.1913, § 6480;

C.S.1922, § 6003;

C.S.1929, § 77-1908;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 33, p. 661;

Laws 1937, c. 171, § 1, p. 678;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 33, p. 448;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 33, p. 632;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-1908;

R.S.1943, § 77-1708;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 10.